District of Columbia statutes.
31-207

Required annual reports of Commissioner — Publication and distribution.

After May 18, 1910, the annual reports of the Commissioner of Insurance and Securities [Commissioner of the Department of Insurance, Securities, and Banking] shall be printed and bound in 1 volume, and shall be ready for distribution not later than the 1st day of the next regular session of Congress thereafter.

May 18, 1910, 36 Stat. 379, ch. 248, § 1
May 21, 1997, D.C. Law 11-268, § 10(e), 44 DCR 1730
Hospital and medical services corporations, applicability of this section, see § 31-3503.
This section is referenced in § 31-3503.
1981 Ed., § 35-107.
1973 Ed., § 35-107.
Department of Insurance abolished: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 31-201.